District of Columbia statutes.
34-202

“Commissioner” defined.

The term “Commissioner” when used in Chapters 1-11 of this title and Chapter 33 of Title 42 shall mean one of the members of such Commission.

Mar. 4, 1913, 37 Stat. 974, ch. 150, § 8, par. 1
1973 Ed., § 43-102.
1981 Ed., § 43-202.